Tennessee, session 114, HB1782.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-4-116(a)(2), is amended by
deleting the language "hybrid electric vehicles and plug-in hybrid electric vehicles" and
substituting instead the language "plug-in hybrid electric vehicles".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-4-116(a)(2)(A), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting instead the following:
(A) On or after January 1, 2027, and prior to January 1, 2028, one hundred
dollars ($100); and
SECTION 3. This act takes effect January 1, 2027, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1782
009816
- 1 -